Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-827
Act, liberal construction.

The Interlocal Cooperation Act is necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants and shall be construed liberally to effect its purposes.

Laws 1991, LB 731, § 27.